Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
ARTICLE 66.5
COMMUNITY TRANSITION SPECIALIST PROGRAM

Section

27-66.5-101. Short title.

The short title of this article 66.5 is the "Community Transition Specialist Program Act".

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added, (SB 18-270), ch. 223, p. 1421, § 1, effective May 21.

27-66.5-102. Definitions.

As used in this article 66.5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Behavioral health administration" or "BHA" means the behavioral health administration established in section 27-50-102.

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of the behavioral health administration.

"High-risk individual" means a person who:

Has a significant mental health or substance use disorder, as evidenced by:

An emergency mental health hold pursuant to section 27-65-106;

A certification for short-term treatment or extended short-term treatment pursuant to section 27-65-109;

Long-term care and treatment pursuant to section 27-65-110;

An emergency commitment pursuant to section 27-81-111;

An involuntary commitment pursuant to section 27-81-112; or

Receiving voluntary behavioral health services pursuant to section 27-65-103, 27-65-104, 27-81-109, or 27-81-110; and

Repealed.

Is not currently engaged or actively enrolled in consistent community-based behavioral health treatment.

Repealed.

(4.5) "Transition services" include, but are not limited to, one or more of the following services:

Access to housing or residential program placement;

Access to behavioral health treatment or benefits;

Advocacy to insurance companies and providers for the appropriate type and intensity of mental health or substance use disorder services;

Planning for follow-up services and coordination within the behavioral health system after hospitalization or discharge from a withdrawal management facility, acute treatment service facility, crisis stabilization service facility, or a hospital or an emergency department following a visit for behavioral health reasons;

Assistance with preparing advance directives;

Obtaining a representative payee or guardian;

Family supportive services; or

Compliance with court appearances or probation.

"Transition specialist" means a person who assists high-risk individuals with transition services.

"Withdrawal management facility" means a facility that provides twenty-four-hour supervised withdrawal from alcohol or drugs in a residential setting.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added, (SB 18-270), ch. 223, p. 1421, § 1, effective May 21.

L. 2020:

(3)(a)(IV) and (3)(a)(V) amended, (SB 20-007), ch. 286, p. 1416, § 53, effective July 13.

L. 2021:

IP(3)(a), (3)(a)(IV), (3)(a)(V), (3)(c), and (5) amended, (3)(a)(VI) and (4.5) added, and (3)(b) repealed, (HB 21-1130), ch. 45, p. 190, § 1, effective April 20.

L. 2022:

(1) and (2) amended and (4) repealed, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1544, § 132, effective July 1; (3)(a)(I), (3)(a)(II), (3)(a)(III), and (3)(a)(VI) amended, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3236, § 43, effective August 10.

27-66.5-103. Community transition specialist program - program requirements - acceptance of referrals - contract for services - rules.

The community transition specialist program is established in the behavioral health administration. The program coordinates referrals of high-risk individuals from withdrawal management facilities, facilities providing acute treatment services, facilities providing crisis stabilization services, and hospitals or emergency departments to appropriate transition specialists.

On or before January 1, 2019, the program must be available statewide, subject to available appropriations. The program must have a process to accept referrals for high-risk individuals and coordinate contact between referred high-risk individuals and appropriate transition specialists. To the extent possible, the coordinated contact must take place prior to the release or discharge of the high-risk individual from a facility.

The program must encourage, but cannot require, withdrawal management facilities, facilities providing acute treatment services, facilities providing crisis stabilization services, and hospitals or emergency departments to contact the program before releasing or discharging a high-risk individual.

The program may encourage, but cannot require, a high-risk individual to accept services from a transition specialist. Participation by a high-risk individual is voluntary and the individual has the right to decline community transition specialist services.

The BHA may contract with a vendor to provide the referral and coordination services required by this article 66.5.

The state board of human services may promulgate rules necessary for the implementation of this article 66.5.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added, (SB 18-270), ch. 223, p. 1423, § 1, effective May 21.

L. 2021:

(1), (2), (3), and (6) amended, (HB 21-1130), ch. 45, p. 191, § 2, effective April 20.

L. 2022:

(1), (5), and (6) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1544, § 133, effective July 1.

27-66.5-104. Data collection and recommendations.

The BHA shall collect information on the following:

Current practices, criteria, and procedures regarding follow-up care for high-risk individuals released or discharged from emergency or involuntary holds, certifications, or commitments; and

Existing capacity to serve high-risk individuals after release or discharge.

On or before January 1, 2020, and on or before January 1 each year thereafter, the BHA shall analyze the data collected in accordance with subsection (1) of this section and prepare recommendations to increase access to, and coordination of, transition specialist services for high-risk individuals. The recommendations must be reported to the commissioner and included in the reporting requirements in section 27-66.5-105.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added, (SB 18-270), ch. 223, p. 1423, § 1, effective May 21.

L. 2022:

IP(1) and (2) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1545, § 134, effective July 1.

27-66.5-105. Reporting requirements - "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" report.

The BHA shall report information on the community transition specialist program in the BHA's annual presentation to the general assembly required under the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", part 2 of article 7 of title 2.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added, (SB 18-270), ch. 223, p. 1423, § 1, effective May 21.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1545, § 135, effective July 1.